Tennessee, session 114, SB1358.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-50-113(a), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting instead:
(a) The officers and employees of the various agencies, boards, and
departments of state government are granted, without charge to the affected officers' or
employees' accumulated leave accounts:
(1) Three (3) days paid leave in the event of the death of such officers' or
employees' spouse, parents, siblings, grandparents, grandchildren, stepparents,
foster parents, or parents-in-law; and
(2) Three (3) months paid leave in the event of the death of such officers'
or employees' children or stepchildren.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1358
003063
- 1 -